test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-padaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - padā: # Noun 39 'eng /est pada/fin' - full paradigm
     padā+N+Sg+Nom: padā
     padā+N+Sg+Gen: padā
     padā+N+Sg+Par: [paʼddõ, paddõ]
     padā+N+Sg+Dat: padān
     padā+N+Sg+Ins: padāks
     padā+N+Sg+Ill: [paʼddõ, paddõ]
     padā+N+Sg+Ela: padāst
     padā+N+Pl+Nom: padād
     padā+N+Pl+Gen: padād
     padā+N+Pl+Par: padīdi
     padā+N+Pl+Dat: padādõn
     padā+N+Pl+Ins: padādõks
     padā+N+Pl+Ill: padīž
     padā+N+Pl+Ela: padīst
